Hawaii, session 2026, SB2200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that over the past several decades, the State has experienced significant urban transformation marked by increasing population density, evolving transportation networks, and ongoing efforts to address housing, climate adaptation, and livability.  Yet, there remains no comprehensive public space dedicated to interpreting and exhibiting the story of the State's urban development. The legislature further finds that other large metropolitan areas have dedicated centers for urban development.  World-class examples like the Singapore City Gallery and the Hong Kong Planning and Infrastructure Gallery have demonstrated how public education in urban design can inspire collective responsibility and innovation.  A state-funded center dedicated to visitor education and urban planning would spotlight the State's prioritization of transit-oriented development, affordable housing, and climate-conscious construction. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a Hawaii urban planning museum. SECTION 2. Chapter 9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part .  Hawaii urban planning museum §9-    Hawaii urban planning museum; established.  (a) There is established within the foundation the Hawaii urban planning museum. (b) The Hawaii urban planning museum shall: (1)  Primarily focus on the past, present, and future of the State; (2)  Showcase the State's history, highlighting land use and development; (3)  Provide a window into current events and issues relating to land use; and (4)  Discuss the future of the State, including but not limited to urban design, economic considerations, conservation efforts, and cultural narratives. (c) The foundation may establish a nonprofit group or select a nonprofit group with demonstrated qualifications to manage and operate the Hawaii urban planning museum, its concessions, or other for-profit business enterprises in a manner that is self-sustaining." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the Hawaii urban planning museum. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________